en: Deck material: Aluminum; Bamboo; Birch; Canadian maple; Carbon fiber; Composite; Fiberglass; Maple; Plastic; Polycarbonate; Polypropylene; Other
pt-BR: Material do deck: Alumínio; Bambu; Bétula; Maple canadense; Fibra de carbono; Composto; Fibra de vidro; Maple; Plástico; Policarbonato; Polipropileno; Outro
cs: Materiál terasy: Hliník; Bambus; Bříza; Kanadský javor; Uhlíková vlákna; Kompozit; Sklolaminát; Javor; Plast; Polykarbonát; Polypropylen; Jiné
pt-PT: Material da tábua: Alumínio; Bambu; Bétula; Bordo canadiano; Fibra de carbono; Composto; Fibra de vidro; Bordo; Plástico; Policarbonato; Polipropileno; Outro
it: Materiale del deck: Alluminio; Bambù; Betulla; Acero canadese; Fibra di carbonio; Materiale composito; Fibra di vetro; Acero; Plastica; Policarbonato; Polipropilene; Altro
hu: Deszka anyaga: Alumínium; Bambusz; Nyírfa; Kanadai juhar; Szénszál; Kompozit; Üvegszál; Juhar; Műanyag; Polikarbonát; Polipropilén; Egyéb
lt-LT: Terasos medžiaga: Aliuminis; Bambukas; Beržas; Kanadietiškas klevas; Anglies pluoštas; Kompozitas; Stiklo pluoštas; Klevas; Plastikas; Polikarbonatas; Polipropilenas; Kita
vi: Chất liệu ván trượt: Nhôm; Tre; Gỗ bạch dương; Gỗ phong Canada; Sợi carbon; Composite; Sợi thủy tinh; Gỗ phong; Nhựa; Polycarbonate; Polypropylene; Khác
de: Deck-Material: Aluminium; Bambus; Birke; Kanadischer Ahorn; Kohlefaser; Komposit; Glasfaser; Ahorn; Kunststoff; Polycarbonat; Polypropylen; Sonstige
es: Material del mazo: Aluminio; Bambú; Abedul; Arce canadiense; Fibra de carbono; Compuesto; Fibra de vidrio; Arce; Plástico; Policarbonato; Polipropileno; Otro
sl-SI: Material krovne plošče: Aluminij; Bambus; Breza; Kanadski javor; Karbonska vlakna; Kompozit; Steklena vlakna; Javor; Plastika; Polikarbonat; Polipropilen; Drugo
hr-HR: Materijal daske: Aluminij; Bambus; Breza; Kanadski javor; Ugljična vlakna; Kompozit; Staklena vlakna; Javor; Plastika; Polikarbonat; Polipropilen; Ostalo
sv: Däckmaterial: Aluminium; Bambu; Björk; Kanadensisk lönn; Kolfiber; Komposit; Glasfiber; Lönn; Plast; Polykarbonat; Polypropen; Övrigt
nb: Dekkmateriale: Aluminium; Bambus; Bjørk; Kanadisk lønn; Karbonfiber; Kompositt; Glassfiber; Lønn; Plast; Polykarbonat; Polypropylen; Annet
tr: Kaykay tahtası malzemesi: Alüminyum; Bambu; Huş ağacı; Kanada akçaağacı; Karbon fiber; Kompozit; Fiberglas; Akçaağaç; Plastik; Polikarbonat; Polipropilen; Diğer
ko: 데크  소재: 알루미늄; 대나무; 자작나무; 캐나다산 단풍나무; 탄소 섬유; 복합 소재; 유리 섬유; 단풍나무; 플라스틱; 폴리카보네이트; 폴리프로필렌; 기타
ja: デッキ素材: アルミニウム; バンブー; バーチ; カナディアンメイプル; カーボンファイバー; 複合素材; グラスファイバー; メイプル; プラスチック; ポリカーボネート; ポリプロピレン; その他
nl: Dekmateriaal: Aluminium; Bamboe; Berk; Canadees esdoorn; Koolstofvezel; Composiet; Glasvezel; Esdoorn; Plastic; Polycarbonaat; Polypropyleen; Overige
fi: Dekin materiaali: Alumiini; Bambu; Koivu; Kanadanvaahtera; Hiilikuitu; Komposiitti; Lasikuitu; Vaahtera; Muovi; Polykarbonaatti; Polypropeeni; Muu
el: Υλικό πλατφόρμας: Αλουμίνιο; Μπαμπού; Σημύδα; Καναδικός σφένδαμος; Ανθρακονήματα; Σύνθετο; Υαλοβάμβακας; Σφένδαμος; Πλαστικό; Πολυανθρακικό; Πολυπροπυλένιο; Άλλο
pl: Materiał blatu: Aluminium; Bambus; Brzoza; Klon kanadyjski; Włókno węglowe; Kompozyt; Włókno szklane; Klon; Plastik; Poliwęglan; Polipropylen; Inne
zh-TW: 甲板材質: 鋁; 竹; 樺木; 加拿大楓木; 碳纖維; 複合材質; 玻璃纖維; 楓木; 塑膠; 聚碳酸酯; 聚丙烯; 其他
fr: Matériau de la terrasse: Aluminium; Bambou; Bouleau; Érable canadien; Fibre de carbone; Composite; Fibre de verre; Érable; Plastique; Polycarbonate; Polypropylène; Autre
zh-CN: 板面材质: 铝; 竹子; 桦木; 加拿大枫木; 碳纤维; 复合材料; 玻璃纤维; 枫木; 塑料; 聚碳酸酯; 聚丙烯; 其他
ro-RO: Materialul punții: Aluminiu; Bambus; Mesteacăn; Arțar canadian; Fibră de carbon; Compozit; Fibră de sticlă; Arțar; Plastic; Policarbonat; Polipropilenă; Altele
th: วัสดุของแผ่นสเก็ตบอร์ด: อะลูมิเนียม; ไม้ไผ่; ไม้เบิร์ช; ไม้เมเปิลแคนาดา; คาร์บอนไฟเบอร์; คอมโพสิต; ไฟเบอร์กลาส; ไม้เมเปิล; พลาสติก; โพลิคาร์บอเนต; โพลิโพรพิลีน; อื่นๆ
da: Brætmateriale: Aluminium; Bambus; Birk; Canadisk ahorn; Kulfiber; Komposit; Glasfiber; Ahorn; Plastik; Polykarbonat; Polypropylen; Andet
ru: Материал деки: Алюминий; Бамбук; Береза; Канадский клен; Углеволокно; Композит; Стекловолокно; Клен; Пластик; Поликарбонат; Полипропилен; Другое
sk-SK: Materiál paluby: Hliník; Bambus; Breza; Kanadský javor; Uhlíkové vlákno; Kompozit; Sklolaminát; Javor; Plast; Polykarbonát; Polypropylén; Iné
bg-BG: Материал на дъската: Алуминий; Бамбук; Бреза; Канадски клен; Въглеродни влакна; Композит; Фибростъкло; Клен; Пластмаса; Поликарбонат; Полипропилен; Друго